District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1074

Taxation of limited liability companies.

Repealed.

History

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 75, 41 DCR 3010
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 6, 50 DCR 896
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1074.
1981 Ed., § 29-1374.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of the Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, Oct. 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of the Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).